District of Columbia statutes.
48-707

Registration of an out-of-state drug manufacturer, distributor, repackager, or wholesaler.

(a)

An out-of-state drug manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler who conducts distribution activities within the District shall register with the Mayor on a form prescribed by the Mayor, renew the registration as required by rule, and pay the required registration fee.

(b)

A person registered to conduct distribution activities within the District shall be licensed or registered and in good standing under federal law and the laws of the state in which the person is incorporated or has a principal place of business.

(c)

The Mayor may withdraw a registration for failure to maintain a license or registration in good standing under state or federal law.

History

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-137, § 8, 37 DCR 2631

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-1007.